Hawaii statutes.
§325-74 Physicians; precautions;
instructions. A physician attending a patient having tuberculosis shall
take all proper precautions and give proper instructions to provide for the
safety of all individuals occupying the same house or apartment. [L 1911, c
118, §13; RL 1925, §950; RL 1935, §1110; RL 1945, §2328; RL 1955, §49-66; HRS
§325-74]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next